Washington statutes.
RCW 8.08.130

Limitation.

Any condemnation, appropriation or disposition intended in RCW 8.08.090 through 8.08.130 shall be deemed and held to be for a county purpose and public use within the meaning of RCW 8.08.090 through 8.08.130 when it is directly or indirectly, approximately or remotely for the general benefit or welfare of the county or of the inhabitants thereof, or when it is otherwise within the meaning of the phrase "for a county purpose" as occurring in the Constitution of this state.

[ 1895 c 2 s 5; RRS s 905.]